District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Full Accountability in Arrest Reporting Temporary Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Arrest report and probable cause affidavit transparency requirements.
(a) Following an arrest, a member of the Metropolitan Police Department shall include the
following information, to the extent known at the time, in documentation supporting the arrest,
including a probable cause affidavit:
(1) The name, badge number or other identifying number, and employing agency
of each law enforcement officer present at the scene;
(2) Whether any law enforcement officer present at the scene used force during the
arrest and, if so, a description of the force used; and
(3) The number of unidentified law enforcement officers at the scene and whether
any law enforcement officer declined to disclose their identity.
(b)(1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(A) Impose any legal obligation on any law enforcement officer other than
a member of the Metropolitan Police Department; or
(B) Create a private right of action.
(2) Failure to comply with any provision in this section shall not be used as evidence
or in any other way in any criminal or civil proceeding.
(c) For the purposes of this section, the term:
(1) “Law enforcement officer” means any sworn member of the Metropolitan
Police Department or any law enforcement officer, including federal officers.
(2) “Probable cause affidavit” means any affidavit prepared by a member of the
Metropolitan Police Department to establish probable cause following a warrantless arrest.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2